Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1309
Refusing to yield a party line; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of refusing to yield a party line if he willfully refuses to relinquish a telephone party line, consisting of a subscriber line telephone circuit with two or more main telephone stations connected therewith, each having a distinctive ring or telephone number, after he has been requested to do so to permit another to place a call, in an emergency in which property or human life is in jeopardy and the prompt summoning of aid is essential, unless such party line is already being used for another such emergency call, or willfully interferes with such an emergency message, or requests the use of such a party line by falsely stating that the same is needed for any such purpose, knowing the statement to be false.

(2) Refusal to yield a party line is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 293.